California statutes. Public Resources Code
(8) The assessment shall report on any other significant delays or barriers affecting timely deployment of renewable energy and zero-carbon resources, including, but not limited to, supply chain disruptions, land use
 restrictions, and permitting processes.

(9) The assessment shall make recommendations to the Legislature on actions needed to resolve any delays or barriers reported in the assessment.

(10) The assessment shall report on any regulatory barriers and challenges to increasing deployment of other preferred resources, including energy efficiency and demand response programs.

(b) The commission shall continue to report on California energy resources that serve load in California in the energy almanac. The commission shall expand the energy almanac report to include storage resources that serve wholesale load. The commission shall report on energy resources that serve load in the Independent Systems Operator system, which is a subset of its current reporting of all California resources, and may include energy resources
 located outside the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 239, Sec. 2.   (SB 846)   Effective September 2, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25233.2.

(a) By September 30, 2023, the commission shall present a cost comparison of whether extended operations at the Diablo Canyon powerplant compared to a portfolio of other feasible resources available for calendar years 2024 to 2035, inclusive, is consistent with the greenhouse gases emissions reduction goals of Section 454.53 of the Public Utilities Code. As part of this comparison, the commission shall evaluate the alternative resource costs, and shall make all evaluations available to the public within the proceeding docket.

(b) With respect to the Department of Water Resources loan to the operator of the Diablo Canyon powerplant, pursuant to Chapter 6.3 (commencing with Section 25548), if the costs of the extension of operations of the
 Diablo Canyon powerplant exceed limits provided for in the loan agreement at any time, the commission shall reevaluate the cost-effectiveness of prolonging the powerplant’s operations.

(c) Within 180 days of the operator of the Diablo Canyon powerplant submitting an application with the United States Department of Energy to receive potential funding for extended operations of the Diablo Canyon powerplant, the commission, in consultation with the Independent System Operator and the Public Utilities Commission, shall make a determination in a public process, whether the state’s electricity forecasts for the calendar years 2024 to 2030, inclusive, show potential for reliability deficiencies if the Diablo Canyon powerplant operation is not extended beyond 2025, and whether extending operations of the Diablo Canyon powerplant to at least 2030 is prudent to ensure reliability in light of any potential for supply deficiency, and is consistent with the
 emissions reduction goals of Section 454.53 of the Public Utilities Code. The determination shall be approved by a vote of the commission at its business meeting.

(d) On or before July 1, 2023, and on July 1 of each year thereafter until 2031, the commission, in coordination with the Public Utilities Commission and the Independent System Operator, shall publish on its internet website in a new report, or as part of another report, an assessment of the operation of the Diablo Canyon powerplant. The report shall include, but not be limited to, outage information, powerplant operational costs, average revenues from electricity sales, worker attrition, and the powerplant’s contribution to resource adequacy requirements. 

(e) The commission may enter into contracts to implement the analysis in subdivisions (a) and (c), and the contracts shall not require the review, consent, or
 approval of the Department of General Services or any other state department or agency and do not need to comply with requirements under the State Contracting Manual, the Public Contract Code, or the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 239, Sec. 3.   (SB 846)   Effective September 2, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25233.5.

To help building owners to decarbonize buildings and add energy storage or electric vehicle charging capacity to buildings, the commission, in coordination with the Public Utilities Commission, the Department of Housing and Community Development, the California Building Standards Commission, and other relevant state agencies, shall gather or develop, and publish on the commission’s internet website, guidance and best practices to help building owners, the construction industry, and local governments overcome barriers to electrification of buildings and installation of electric vehicle charging equipment that include any of the following topics:

(a) Availability of electrical equipment for replacement of the common fossil-fuel-powered equipment within buildings, including
 high-efficiency options that can minimize electrical service capacity requirements.

(b) Approaches for energy budgeting to fit electrical replacements and vehicle-charging equipment within the existing electrical service capacity of the building whenever possible, including guidance on how to maximize the use of the nonconcurrent electrical load that is allowed under the California Electrical Code (Part 3 (commencing with Section 89.101.1) of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations).

(c) Technologies that allow the noncoincidental sharing of electrical circuits.

(d) The development of whole building electrification plans to help building owners prepare for future additions of electrical equipment, even if only a portion of equipment will be replaced, or energy storage or vehicle charging added, during an
 initial project. The plan may include wiring changes and energy planning to reduce the need for rework and help correctly size distributed energy and energy storage systems to anticipated future needs, including anticipated future voluntary and mandatory vehicle charging standards in the California Building Standards Code.

(e) Model permit applications, an eligibility checklist for expedited permitting, and a concise inspection list for the most common building electrification, energy storage, or vehicle charging installation projects that would be suitable for adoption by local governments seeking to streamline and standardize permitting and inspections.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 346, Sec. 3.   (AB 2075)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

25235.

(a) For purposes of this section, “financing or investment solutions” means financing or investment solutions that are consistent with the United States Environmental Protection Agency’s inclusive utility investments policies or other industry best practices, and that will enable electrical corporations, community choice aggregators, or other eligible entities to provide zero-emission, clean energy, or decarbonizing building upgrades.

(b) (1) On or before December 31, 2023, the
 commission, in coordination with the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development, the Public Utilities Commission, and the Treasurer, shall do all of the following:

(A) Identify available state and federal financing or investment solutions.

(B) Apply for federal financing or investment solutions, where applicable.

(C) Provide technical assistance to electrical corporations, community choice aggregators, or other eligible entities to apply for state and federal financing or investment solutions.

(2) The commission may consult with the United States Department of Energy regarding the identification of federal financing or investment solutions,
 pursuant to paragraph (1).

(3) To maximize the state’s access to federal financing or investment solutions, pursuant to paragraph (1), the commission may do any of the following:

(A) Identify the authority of the Treasurer to administer financing or investment solutions, and to identify programs administered by the Treasurer that provide financing or investment solutions.

(B) Identify funding appropriated in the Budget Act of 2022 that enables or otherwise impacts the availability of federal funding for financing or investment solutions.

(C) Identify state programs, authorizations, and administrative actions that enable, or could enable, access to federal
 funding for financing or investment solutions, including, but not limited to, Public Utilities Commission Rulemaking 20-08-022 (Order Instituting Rulemaking to Investigate and Design Clean Energy Financing Options for Electricity and Natural Gas Customers), filed August 27, 2020.

(c) On or before December 31, 2023, the commission shall prepare and submit a report to the relevant committees of the Legislature that describes any statutory changes necessary to improve access to federal funding for financing or investment solutions.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 834, Sec. 1.   (SB 1112)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Integrated Energy Policy Reporting [25300. - 25328.]

25300.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that clean and reliable energy is essential to the health of the California economy and of vital importance to the health and welfare of the citizens of the state and to the environment.

(b) The Legislature further finds and declares that government has an essential role to ensure that a reliable supply of energy is provided consistent with protection of public health and safety, promotion of the general welfare, maintenance of a sound economy, conservation of resources, and preservation of environmental quality.

(c) The Legislature further finds and declares that the state government requires at all times a complete and thorough understanding of the operation of energy markets, including electricity, natural gas, petroleum, and alternative energy sources, to enable it to respond to possible shortages, price shocks, oversupplies, or other disruptions.

(d) The Legislature further finds and declares that timely reporting, assessment, forecasting, and data collection activities are essential to serve the information and policy development needs of the Governor, the Legislature, public agencies, market participants, and the public.

(e) The Legislature further finds and declares that one of the objectives of this act is to encourage cooperation among the various state agencies with energy responsibilities.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 568, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

25301.

(a) At least every two years, the commission shall conduct assessments and forecasts of all aspects of energy industry supply, production, transportation, delivery and distribution, demand, and prices. The commission shall use these assessments and forecasts to develop and evaluate energy policies and programs that conserve resources, protect the environment, ensure energy reliability, enhance the state’s economy, and protect public health and safety. To perform these assessments and forecasts, the commission may require the submission of demand forecasts, resource plans, market assessments, related outlooks, individual customer historic electric or gas service usage, or both, and individual customer historic billing
 data, in a format and level of granularity specified by the commission from electric and natural gas utilities, transportation fuel and technology suppliers, and other market participants. These assessments and forecasts shall be done in consultation with the appropriate state and federal agencies, including, but not limited to, the Public Utilities Commission, the Public Advocate’s Office of the Public Utilities Commission, the State Air Resources Board, the Electricity Oversight Board, the Independent System Operator, the Department of Water Resources, the Department of Transportation, and the Department of Motor Vehicles. The commission shall maintain reasonable policies and procedures to protect customer information from unauthorized disclosure.

(b) In developing the assessments and
 forecasts prepared pursuant to subdivision (a), the commission shall do all of the following:

(1) Provide information about the performance of energy industries.

(2) Develop and maintain the analytical capability sufficient to answer inquiries about energy issues from the government, market participants, and the public.

(3) Analyze, develop, and evaluate energy policies and programs.

(4) Provide an analytical foundation for regulatory and policy decisionmaking.

(5) Facilitate efficient and reliable energy markets.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 611, Sec. 1.   (SB 1374)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

25302.

(a) Beginning November 1, 2003, and every two years thereafter, the commission shall adopt an integrated energy policy report. This integrated report shall contain an overview of major energy trends and issues facing the state, including, but not limited to, supply, demand, pricing, reliability, efficiency, and impacts on public health and safety, the economy, resources, and the environment. The integrated energy policy report shall present policy recommendations based on an in-depth
 and integrated analysis of the most current and pressing energy issues facing the state. The analyses supporting this integrated energy policy report shall explicitly address interfuel and intermarket effects to provide a more informed evaluation of potential tradeoffs when developing energy policy across different markets and systems.

(b) The integrated energy policy report shall include an assessment and forecast of system reliability and the need for resource additions, efficiency, and conservation that considers all aspects of energy industries and markets that are essential for the state economy, general welfare, public health and safety, energy diversity, and protection of the environment. This assessment shall be based on the determinations made pursuant to this chapter.

(c) Beginning November 1, 2004, and every two years thereafter, the commission shall prepare an energy
 policy review to update analyses from the integrated energy policy report prepared pursuant to subdivisions
 (a) and (b), or to raise energy issues that have emerged since the release of the integrated energy policy report. The commission may also periodically prepare and release technical analyses and assessments of energy issues and concerns to provide timely and relevant information for the Governor, the Legislature, market participants, and the public.

(d) In the preparation of the report, the commission shall consult with the following entities: the Public Utilities Commission, the Public Advocate’s Office of the Public
 Utilities Commission, the State Air Resources Board, the Electricity Oversight Board, the Independent System Operator, the Department of Water Resources, the Department of Transportation, and the Department of Motor Vehicles, and any federal, state, and local agencies it deems necessary in preparation of the integrated energy policy report. To assure the collaborative development of state energy policies, these agencies shall make a good faith effort to provide data, assessment, and proposed recommendations for review by the commission.

(e) The commission shall provide the report to the Public Utilities Commission, the Public Advocate’s Office of the Public Utilities Commission, the State Air Resources Board, the Electricity Oversight Board, the Independent System Operator, the Department of Water Resources, and the Department of Transportation. For the purpose of ensuring consistency in the underlying information that forms the foundation of energy policies and decisions affecting the state, those entities shall carry out their energy-related duties and responsibilities based upon the information and analyses contained in the report. If an entity listed in this subdivision objects to information contained in the
 report and has a reasonable basis for that objection, the entity shall not be required to consider that information in carrying out its energy-related duties.

(f) The commission shall make the report accessible to state, local, and federal entities and to the general public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 611, Sec. 2.   (SB 1374)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

25302.4.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Fusion” means a reaction in which at least one heavier, more stable nucleus is produced from at least one lighter, less stable nucleus, typically through high temperatures and pressures, and emitting energy as a result.

(2) “Fusion energy” means the product of fusion reactions inside a fusion device and used to generate electricity or other commercially usable forms of energy.

(b) As part of the 2027 edition of the integrated energy policy report, the commission shall include an assessment of the potential for fusion energy to contribute to California’s power supply, including both
 of the following:

(1) Identification of the necessary regulatory and policy actions required to deploy fusion energy, including aneutronic fusion and deuterium and tritium reactions, within California’s energy system.

(2) Identification of state and federal investments available for fusion energy development and deployment.

(c) For purposes of the assessment described in subdivision (b), the commission shall define aneutronic fusion.

(d) This section shall remain in
 effect only until January 1,
 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 360, Sec. 2.   (AB 1172)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

25302.5.

(a) As part of each integrated energy policy report required pursuant to Section 25302, each entity that serves or plans to serve electricity to retail customers, including, but not limited to, electrical corporations, nonutility electric service providers, community choice aggregators, and local publicly owned electric utilities, shall provide the commission with its forecast of both of the following:

(1) The amount of its forecasted load that may be lost or added by any of the following:

(A) A community choice aggregator.

(B) An existing local publicly owned electric utility.

(C) A newly formed local publicly owned electric utility.

(2) Load that will be served by an electric service provider.

(b) The commission shall perform an assessment in the service territory of each electrical corporation of the loss or addition of load described in this section and submit the results of the assessment to the Public Utilities Commission.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the commission may exempt from the forecasting requirements in that subdivision, a local publicly owned electric utility that is not planning to acquire additional load beyond its existing exclusive service territory within the forecast period provided by the commission pursuant to Section 25303.

(d) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Community choice aggregator” means any “community choice aggregator” as defined in Section 331.1 of the Public Utilities Code.

(2) “Electrical corporation” means any “electrical corporation” as defined in Section 218 of the Public Utilities Code.

(3) “Electric service provider” means any “electric service provider” as defined in Section 218.3 of the Public Utilities Code.

(4) “Local publicly owned electric utility” means any “local publicly owned electric utility” as defined in Section 224.3 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 558, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

25302.6.

As part of the 2025 edition of the integrated energy policy report, the commission, in consultation with the Public Utilities Commission, shall assess barriers to electricity interconnection and energization and provide recommendations on how to accelerate those processes, as appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 367, Sec. 2.   (AB 1373)   Effective October 7, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

25302.7.

By June 1, 2023, the commission, in consultation with the Public Utilities Commission and the Independent System Operator, shall adopt a goal for load shifting to reduce net peak electrical demand and shall adjust this target in each biennial integrated energy policy report prepared pursuant to Section 25302 thereafter. In developing this target, the commission shall consider the findings of the 2020 Lawrence Berkeley National Laboratory report on the Shift Resource through 2030 and other relevant research. The commission, in consultation with the Public Utilities Commission and the Independent System Operator, shall recommend policies to increase demand response and load shifting that do not increase greenhouse gas emissions or increase electric rates.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 239, Sec. 4.   (SB 846)   Effective September 2, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25303.

(a) As part of the report prepared pursuant to Section 25302, the commission shall conduct electricity and natural gas forecasting and assessment activities, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Assessment of trends in electricity and natural gas supply and demand, and the outlook for wholesale and retail prices for commodity electricity and natural gas under current market structures and expected market conditions.

(2) Forecasts of statewide and regional electricity and natural gas demand, including annual, seasonal, and peak demand, and the factors leading to projected demand growth, including, but not
 limited to, projected population growth, urban development, industrial expansion and energy intensity of industries, energy demand for different building types, energy efficiency, and other factors influencing demand for electricity. With respect to long-range forecasts of the demand for natural gas, the report shall include an evaluation of average conditions, as well as best- and worst-case scenarios, and an evaluation of the impact of the increasing use of renewable resources on natural gas demand.

(3) Evaluation of the adequacy of electricity and natural gas supplies to meet forecasted demand growth. Assessment of the availability, reliability, and efficiency of the electricity and natural gas infrastructure and systems, including, but not limited to, natural gas production capability both in and out of state, natural gas interstate
 and intrastate pipeline capacity, storage and use, and western regional and California electricity and transmission system capacity and use.

(4) Evaluation of potential impacts of electricity and natural gas supply, demand, and infrastructure and resource additions on the electricity and natural gas systems, public health and safety, the economy, resources, and the environment.

(5) Evaluation of the potential impacts of electricity and natural gas load management efforts, including end-user response to market price signals, as a means to ensure reliable operation of electricity and natural gas systems.

(6) Evaluation of whether electricity and natural gas markets are adequately meeting public interest objectives
 including the provision of all of the following: economic benefits; competitive, low-cost reliable services; customer information and protection; and environmentally sensitive electricity and natural gas supplies. This evaluation may consider the extent to which California is an element within western energy markets, the existence of appropriate incentives for market participants to provide supplies and for consumers to respond to energy prices, appropriate identification of responsibilities of various market participants, and an assessment of long-term versus short-term market performance. To the extent this evaluation identifies market shortcomings, the commission shall propose market structure changes to improve performance.

(7) Identification of impending or potential problems or uncertainties in the electricity and natural gas markets,
 potential options and solutions, and recommendations.

(b) Commencing November 1, 2003, and every two years thereafter, to be included in the integrated energy policy report prepared pursuant to Section 25302, the commission shall assess the current status of the following:

(1) The environmental performance of the electric generation facilities of the state, to include all of the following:

(A) Generation facility efficiency.

(B) Air emission pollution control technologies in use in operating plants.

(C) The extent to which recent resource additions have, and expected resource additions are
 likely to, displace or reduce the operation of existing facilities, including the environmental consequences of these changes.

(2) The geographic distribution of statewide environmental, efficiency, and socioeconomic benefits and drawbacks of existing generation facilities, including, but not limited to, the impacts on natural resources including wildlife habitat, air quality, and water resources, and the relationship to demographic factors. The assessment shall describe the socioeconomic and demographic factors that existed when the facilities were constructed and the current status of these factors. In addition, the report shall include how expected or recent resource additions could change the assessment through displaced or reduced operation of existing facilities.

(c) The commission, in consultation with the Public Utilities Commission, shall make all reasonable adjustments to its energy demand forecasts conducted pursuant to Sections 25301 and 25302 to account for its findings of market conditions and existing baselines, and, in making those adjustments, may consider the results from subdivisions (b) and (d) of Section 381.2 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 611, Sec. 3.   (SB 1374)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

25304.

As a part of the report prepared pursuant to Section 25302, the commission shall conduct transportation forecasting and assessment activities, including, but not limited to:

(a) Assessment of trends in transportation fuels, technologies, and infrastructure supply and demand and the outlook for wholesale and retail prices for petroleum, petroleum products, and alternative transportation fuels under current market structures and expected market conditions.

(b) Forecasts of statewide and regional transportation energy demand, both annual and seasonal, and the factors leading to projected demand growth
 including, but not limited to, projected population growth, urban development, vehicle miles traveled, the type, class, and efficiency of personal vehicles and commercial fleets, and shifts in transportation modes.

(c) Evaluation of the sufficiency of transportation fuel supplies, technologies, and infrastructure to meet projected transportation demand growth. Assessment of crude oil and other transportation fuel feedstock supplies; in-state, national, and worldwide production and refining capacity; product output storage availability; and transportation and distribution systems capacity and use.

(d) Assessments of the risks of supply disruptions, price shocks, or other events and the consequences of these events on the availability and price of transportation fuels and effects
 on the state’s economy.

(e) Evaluation of the potential for needed changes in the state’s energy shortage contingency plans to increase production and productivity, improve efficiency of fuel use, increase conservation of resources, and other actions to maintain sufficient, secure, and affordable transportation fuel supplies for the state.

(f) Evaluation of alternative transportation energy scenarios, in the context of least environmental and economic costs, to examine potential effects of alternative fuels usage, vehicle efficiency improvements, and shifts in transportation modes on public health and safety, the economy, resources, the environment, and energy security.

(g) Examination of the success of the
 introduction, prices, and availability of advanced transportation technologies, low- or zero-emission vehicles, and clean-burning transportation fuels, including their potential future contributions to air quality, energy security, and other public interest benefits.

(h) Recommendations to improve the efficiency of transportation energy use, reduce dependence on petroleum fuels, decrease environmental impacts from transportation energy use, and contribute to reducing congestion, promoting economic development, and enhancing energy diversity and security.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 611, Sec. 5.   (SB 1374)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

25305.

The commission shall rely upon forecasting and assessments performed in accordance with Sections 25301 to 25304, inclusive, as the basis for analyzing the success of and developing policy recommendations for public interest energy strategies. Public interest energy strategies include, but are not limited to, achieving energy efficiency and energy conservation; implementing load management; pursuing research, development, demonstration, and commercialization of new technologies; promoting renewable generation technologies; reducing statewide greenhouse gas emissions and addressing the impacts of climate change on California; stimulating California’s energy-related business activities to contribute to the state’s economy; and protecting and enhancing the environment. Additional assessments to address public interest energy strategies shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(a) Identification of emerging trends in energy efficiency in the residential, commercial, industrial, agricultural, and transportation sectors of the state’s economy, including, but not limited to, evaluation of additional achievable energy efficiency measures and technologies. Identification of policies that would permit fuller realization of the potential for energy efficiency, either through direct programmatic actions or facilitation of the market.

(b) Identification of emerging trends in the renewable energy industry. In addition, the commission shall evaluate progress in ensuring the operation of existing facilities, and the development of new and emerging, in-state renewable resources.

(c) Identification of emerging trends in energy research, development, and demonstration activities that advance science or technology to produce public benefits.

(d) Identification of progress in reducing statewide greenhouse gas emissions and addressing the effects of climate change on California.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 568, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

25305.1.

The commission shall report to the Legislature, to be included in each integrated energy policy report prepared pursuant to Section 25302, regarding the progress made by each local publicly owned electric utility serving end-use customers in meeting the requirements of Section 9620 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 606, Sec. 1.   (AB 2227)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

25305.2.

The commission shall include a summary of the information reported pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 9505 of the Public Utilities Code in the integrated energy policy report prepared pursuant to Section 25302. The commission shall also include, for each local publicly owned electric utility, a comparison of the local publicly owned electric utility’s annual targets established in accordance with that section, and the local publicly owned electric utility’s actual energy efficiency savings and demand reductions. If the commission determines that improvements
 can be made in either the level of a local publicly owned electric utility’s annual targets to achieve all cost-effective, reliable, and feasible energy savings and demand reductions and to enable local publicly owned electric utilities, in the aggregate, to achieve statewide targets established pursuant to Section 25310, or in meeting each local publicly owned electric utility’s annual targets, the commission shall provide recommendations to the local publicly owned electric utility, the Legislature, and the Governor on those improvements.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 606, Sec. 2.   (AB 2227)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

25305.5.

(a) The commission shall timely incorporate firm zero-carbon resources into the integrated energy policy report prepared pursuant to Section 25302.

(b) For purposes of this section, “firm zero-carbon resources” are electrical resources that can individually, or in combination, deliver zero-carbon electricity with high availability for the expected duration of multiday extreme or atypical weather events, including periods of low renewable energy generation, and facilitate integration of eligible renewable energy resources into the electrical grid and the transition to a zero-carbon electrical grid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 353, Sec. 12.   (AB 1533)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

25306.

The commission shall conduct workshops, hearings, and other forums to gain the perspectives of the public and market participants for purposes of the integrated energy policy report prepared pursuant to Section 25302 and the forecasting and assessments prepared pursuant to Sections 25301, 25303, 25304, and 25305. The commission shall include the comments, as well as responses to those comments, of governmental agencies, industry representatives, market participants, private groups, and any other person concerning the commission’s proposals and recommendations in the docket for the integrated energy policy report.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 568, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

25307.

(a) For purposes of this section, “decarbonizing” means reducing or eliminating associated emissions of greenhouse gases.

(b) As part of the 2023 and 2025 editions of the integrated energy policy report, the commission shall study and model potential growth for hydrogen and its role in decarbonizing the electrical and transportation sectors of the economy, and helping to achieve the goals set forth in The 100 Percent Clean Energy Act of 2018 (Chapter 312 of the Statutes of 2018), the California Global Warming Solutions Act of 2006 (Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38500) of the Health and Safety Code), and the Clean Energy and Pollution Reduction Act of 2015
 (Chapter 547 of the Statutes of 2015).

(c) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section is repealed on January 1, 2030.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 363, Sec. 3.   (SB 1075)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

25308.

The commission and Public Utilities Commission, in coordination with the Independent System Operator, every five years, shall review and update as necessary the Memorandum of Understanding Between the California Public Utilities Commission (CPUC) and the California Energy Commission (CEC) and the California Independent System Operator (ISO) Regarding Transmission and Resource Planning and Implementation (December 23, 2022) and the related workplan to ensure the memorandum and workplan reflect the coordination that is needed to help meet the state’s energy goals, including those goals described in Section 454.53 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 390, Sec. 1.   (SB 319)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

25308.5.

(a) On or before July 1, 2025, the commission, Public Utilities Commission, and Independent System Operator shall jointly develop an electrical transmission infrastructure development guidebook that describes the
 state’s electrical transmission infrastructure planning and permitting processes conducted by the commission, Public Utilities Commission, and Independent System Operator.

(b) In developing the electrical transmission infrastructure development guidebook, the commission, Public Utilities Commission, and Independent System Operator shall make a reasonable and good faith effort to consult with all relevant local, state, tribal, and federal agencies.

(c) The electrical transmission infrastructure development guidebook shall include a description of the different stages of electrical transmission infrastructure development, an analysis of the average timeframes for electrical transmission infrastructure planning and permitting by the commission, Public Utilities Commission, and Independent System Operator, clearly identify and describe the roles, responsibilities, and decisionmaking authority of federal agencies and state agencies, including the commission, Public Utilities Commission, and Independent System Operator, and include interfaces with federal agencies, including timing, sequence, and coordination with federal permitting agencies, and
 coordination between reviews under the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)) and the federal National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 4321 et seq.).

(d) The commission, Public Utilities Commission, and Independent System Operator shall provide an opportunity for stakeholder input in the development and communication of the
 electrical transmission infrastructure development guidebook and an opportunity for public comment on a draft electrical transmission infrastructure development guidebook.

(e) For purposes of this section, “electrical transmission infrastructure” means electrical transmission facilities and equipment used to convey electricity from an electrical generation facility or energy storage system to the electrical distribution system or transmission-voltage load.

(f) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 390, Sec. 2.   (SB 319)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

25310.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “End use” means the purpose for which energy is used, including, but not limited to, heating, cooling, or lighting, or class of energy uses upon which an energy efficiency program is focused, typically categorized by equipment purpose, equipment energy use intensity, or building type.

(2) “Energy efficiency savings” means reduced electricity or
 natural gas usage produced either by the installation of an energy efficiency measure or the adoption of an energy efficiency practice that maintains at least the same level of end-use service or by conservation actions that reduce energy use by reducing the quantity of baseline energy services demanded.
